Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Chapter 08. Oil and Hazardous Substance Releases.

Cross references. —

For other provisions related to oil pollution control, see AS 46.04; for other provisions related to hazardous substance release control, see AS 46.09; for authority of municipalities to implement this chapter, see AS

46.09.060(b)

.